Tennessee, session 114, SB2185.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-3-2207(e), is amended by deleting
"such report to the governor and the general assembly" and substituting "such report to the
governor, the general assembly, the legislative librarian".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2185
012113
- 1 -